Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-97 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, for any pesticide
registered with the United States Environmental Protection Agency
under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7
U.S.C., Section 136 et seq., the label approved by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency in registering the pesticide, or a
label consistent with the most recent human health assessment
performed under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide
Act, or a label consistent with the United States Environmental
Protection Agency carcinogenicity classification for the pesticide
under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, shall
be sufficient to satisfy any requirements for a warning regarding
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1078 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

heal th or safety under Oklahoma state law, including, without
limitation, the duty to warn, or any other common law duty to warn
if:
1. Approved by the Environmental Protection Agency under the
Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act and by the
Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry at the time
of sale;
2. Consistent with the most recent human health assessment
performed by Environmental Protection Agency under the Federal
Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act at the time of sale; or
3. Consistent with the Environmental Protection Agency
carcinogenicity classification for the pesticide under the Federal
Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act at the time of sale.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
March 3, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS









SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1078 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)